Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1607.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 61.9 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. All state agencies shall report to the Office of Management
and Enterprise Services the number of contract employees within its
agency by July 1, 2026, and each year thereafter.
B. Reports shall include the pay of each contract employee and
the conditions of each employee's contract.
C. Reporting shall be made through existing payroll software.
D. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall have
the authority to promulgate rules to carry out the provisions of
this act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

Passed the House of Representatives the 21st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 8th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1607 Page 2